District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.114

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed in accordance with this subchapter, no person shall use the words or terms “land surveyor”, or “licensed land surveyor,” or any words for the purpose of implying that the person is authorized to perform the services of a land surveyor in the District.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.114.